Florida, session 2026, HB801.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (14) is added to section 561.20,
Florida Statutes, to read:
561.20 Limitation upon number of licenses issued.—
(14)(a) In addition to any license that may be issued
under this chapter, the division may issue a special license for
the retail sale of a THC-infused beverage pursuant to s.
561.20(a)4., which authorizes the sale of intoxicating beverages
by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises of a
restaurant.
(b) Notwithstanding any provisions in this chapter, or any
other law to the contrary, a THC-infused beverage may be sold at
retail only by an individual or entity that is issued a quota
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb801-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 801 2026
license pursuant to subsection (1) or a special license pursuant
to this subsection by the division.
(c) Any individual or entity that has not been issued a
quota license under subsection (1) or a special license under
this section by the division may not sell, offer for sale,
possess for sale, or distribute for sale THC-infused beverages
in this state.
(d) A violation of this section constitutes an unlicensed
activity under the Beverage Law and shall be punished in the
same manner as the unlicensed sale or service of alcoholic
beverages, including penalties under chapters 561, 562, and 565.
(e) As used in this subsection, the term "THC-infused
beverage" means any beverage intended for human consumption that
contains hemp-derived delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol or any other
intoxicating cannabinoid in any amount, regardless of whether
such beverage is an alcoholic beverage.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb801-00